Utah statutes.
49-11-606.   Full participation.

Except as provided in Sections 49-12-203, 49-12-204, 49-13-203, 49-13-204, 49-14-203, and 49-15-203, participating employers shall cover all employees eligible for service credit under this title.



Enacted by Chapter 250, 2002 General Session

